Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202661-215
Water divisions; division supervisors.

There shall be one or more division supervisors acting for the Chief Water Officer to administer the public water of the state in water division No. 1 and water division No. 2, as created by section 61-212. Such a division supervisor, acting for the Chief Water Officer, shall have the immediate direction and control of the distribution of water in such manner as directed by the Chief Water Officer.

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. VII, art. V, div. 2, § 3, p. 834;

C.S.1922, § 8422;

C.S.1929, § 81-6303;

R.S.1943, § 46-218;

Laws 1953, c. 157, § 1, p. 495;

Laws 1987, LB 140, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1998), § 46-218;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 15;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 338.